Massachusetts, session 194th, S2072.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Clause Twenty-second H of section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in
the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 946, the words “5
consecutive years” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 1 year.
of 1